dictsource/th_rules
// Thai pronunciation rules (Thai script)

// Consonants 
.L01 ก ข ฃ ค ฅ ฆ ง จ ฉ ช ซ ฌ ญ ฎ ฏ ฐ ฑ ฒ ณ ด ต ถ ท ธ น บ ป ผ ฝ พ ฟ ภ ม ย ร ล ว ศ ษ ส ห ฬ อ ฮ

.replace
// Convert numbers
๐ 0
๑ 1
๒ 2
๓ 3
๔ 4
๕ 5
๖ 6
๗ 7
๘ 8
๙ 9

.group		์
	ก์
	ข์
	ฃ์
	ค์
	ฅ์
	ง์
	ฆ์
	จ์
	ฉ์
	ช์
	ซ์
	ณ์
	ฌ์
	ญ์
	ด์

// punctuation
.group		บ	// บ
	_) บ	b	// TODO: phoneme
	บ (_	p

.group		ฎ
	_) ฎ	d
	ฎ (_	t
	_)ฎร์

.group		ฑ
	_) ฑ	d

.group		ด
	_) ด	d
	ด (_	t
	_)ดร์

.group		ฝ
	_) ฝ	f

.group		ฟ
	_) ฟ	f
	ฟ (_	p

.group		ห
	_) ห	h
	หญ	j
	หย	j
	_) หล	l
	_) หม	m
	_) หน	n
	_) หง	ŋ
	_) หร	r
	_) หว	w

.group		ฮ
	_) ฮ	h

.group		ญ
	_) ญ	j
	ญ (_	n

.group		ย
	_) ย	j
	ย (_	j

.group		ก
	_) ก	k
	ก (_	k
	กร (_	k
	กร	k

.group		ข
	_) ข	kh
	ข (_	k
	_)ขณ์

.group		ฃ
	_) ฃ	kh

.group		ค
	_) ค	kh
	ค (_	k
	คร (_	k
	คง	khoŋ
	คด	khot˦˥
	คน	khon
	คบ	khop˦˥
	คม	khom
	ครก	khrok˦˥
	ครบ	khrop˦˥
	ครรภ์	khan
	ครอง	khrɔ:ŋ
	ครอบ	khrɔ:p˥˩
	ครัช	khrach˦˥
	ครับ	khrap˦˥
	ครัว	khrua
	ครั่ง	khraŋ˥˩
	ครั้ง	khraŋ˦˥
	ครั้น	khran˦˥
	ครา	khra:
	คราง	khra:ŋ
	คราด	khra:t˥˩
	คราบ	khra:p˥˩
	คราม	khra:m
	คราว	khra:w
	คราส	khra:t˥˩
	คริสต์	khrit˦˥
	ครีบ	khri:p˥˩
	ครีม	khri:m
	ครึ่ง	khrɯŋ˥˩
	ครุ	khruʔ˦˥
	ครุฑ	khrut˦˥
	ครุย	khruj
	ครู	khru:
	ครู่	khru:˥˩
	คร่อม	khrɔ:m˥˩
	คร่า	khra:˥˩
	คร้าน	khra:n˦˥
	คร้าม	khra:m˦˥
	คลอ	khlɔ:
	คลอก	khlɔ:k˥˩
	คลอง	khlɔ:ŋ
	คลอด	khlɔ:t˥˩
	คลอน	khlɔ:n
	คละ	khlaʔ˦˥
	คลัง	khlaŋ
	คลับ	khlap˨˩
	คลั่ง	khlaŋ˥˩
	คลาด	khla:t˥˩
	คลาน	khla:n
	คลาย	khla:j
	คลาส	khla:s˥˩
	คลำ	khlam
	คลิก	khlik˦˥
	คลี่	khli:˥˩
	คลื่น	khlɯ:n˥˩
	คลุก	khluk˦˥
	คลุม	khlum
	คล่อง	khlɔŋ˥˩
	คล้อง	khlɔ:ŋ˦˥
	คล้าย	khla:j˦˥
	คล้ำ	khlam˦˥
	ควง	khuaŋ
	ควบ	khuap˥˩
	ควย	khuaj
	ควร	khuan
	ควอล	khwɔ:l
	ควัก	khwak˦˥
	ควัน	khwan
	ควาญ	khwa:n
	ควาน	khwa:n
	ความ	khwa:m
	ควาย	khwa:j
	ควินซ์	khwins˦˥
	ควีน	khwi:n
	คว่ำ	khwam˥˩
	คว้า	khwa:˦˥
	คว้าง	khwa:ŋ˦˥
	คว้าน	khwa:n˦˥
	คอ	khɔ:
	คอก	khɔ:k˥˩
	คอด	khɔ:t˥˩
	คอน	khɔ:n
	คอม	khɔm
	คอย	khɔ:j
	คอร์ด	khɔ:t˨˩
	คะ	khaʔ˦˥
	คัด	khat˦˥
	คัน	khan
	คับ	khap˦˥
	คั่ง	khaŋ˥˩
	คั่น	khan˥˩
	คั่ว	khua˥˩
	คั้น	khan˦˥
	คา	kha:
	คาง	kha:ŋ
	คาด	kha:t˥˩
	คาน	kha:n
	คาบ	kha:p˥˩
	คาย	kha:j
	คาว	kha:w
	คำ	kham
	คิง	khiŋ
	คิด	khit˦˥
	คิว	khiw
	คิ้ว	khiw˦˥
	คีต	khi:t˥˩
	คีบ	khi:p˥˩
	คีม	khi:m
	คี่	khi:˥˩
	คึก	khɯk˦˥
	คืน	khɯ:n
	คืบ	khɯ:p˥˩
	คือ	khɯ:
	คุ	khuʔ˦˥
	คุก	khuk˦˥
	คุง	khuŋ
	คุณ	khun
	คุม	khum
	คุย	khuj
	คุ้น	khun˦˥
	คุ้ม	khum˦˥
	คุ้ย	khuj˦˥
	คู	khu:
	คูณ	khu:n
	คูถ	khu:t˥˩
	คูน	khu:n
	คู่	khu:˥˩
	คู้	khu:˦˥
	ค่อน	khɔn˥˩
	ค่อม	khɔm˥˩
	ค่อย	khɔj˥˩
	ค่ะ	khaʔ˥˩
	ค่า	kha:˥˩
	ค่าง	kha:ŋ˥˩
	ค่าย	kha:j˥˩
	ค่ำ	kham˥˩
	ค้น	khon˦˥
	ค้อน	khɔ:n˦˥
	ค้า	kha:˦˥
	ค้าง	kha:ŋ˦˥
	ค้าน	kha:n˦˥
	ค้ำ	kham˦˥

.group		ฅ
	_) ฅ	kh

.group		ฆ
	_) ฆ	kh
	ฆ (_	k

.group		ล
	_) ล	l
	ล (_	n

.group		ฬ
	_) ฬ	l
	ฬ (_	n

.group		ม
	_) ม	m
	ม (_	m

.group		ณ
	_) ณ	n

.group		น
	L01) น(_	on	// จน ชน บน ... ◌น
	_) น	n
	น (_	n

.group		ง
	_) ง	ŋ
	ง (_	ŋ

.group		ป
	_) ป	p
	ป (_	p

.group		ผ
	_) ผ	ph

.group		พ
	_) พ	ph
	พ (_	p

.group		ภ
	_) ภ	ph
	ภ (_	p

.group		ร
	_) ร	r
	ร (_	n
	รุ (_	n
	รถ (_	t
	รท (_	t
	_)ริย์

.group		ซ
	_) ซ	s
	ซ (_	t
 	_) ซร	s

.group		ท
	_) ท	th
	ท (_	t
	_) ทร	s
	ทร (_	t
	_)ทร์
	_)ทก์

.group		ศ
	_) ศ	s
	ศ (_	t
	_) ศร	s

.group		ษ
	_) ษ	s
	ษ (_	t
	_)ษณ์
	_)ษก์
	_)ษมณ์

.group		ส
	_) ส	s
	ส (_	t
	_) สร	s
	_)สร์

.group		ฏ
	_) ฏ	t

.group		ต
	_) ต	t
	ต (_	t
	ตร (_	t
	ติ (_	t
	ตุ (_	t
	_)ตร์

.group		ฐ
	_) ฐ	th
	ฐ (_	t

.group		ฑ
	_) ฑ	th
	ฑ (_	t

.group		ฒ
	_) ฒ	th
	ฒ (_	t
	ฒิ (_	t

.group		ถ
	_) ถ	th
	ถ (_	t

.group		ธ
	_) ธ	th
	ธ (_	t
	ธิ (_	t
	_)ธน์

.group		จ
	_) จ	ch
	จ (_	t
	_) จร	ch
	_)จน์

.group		ฉ
	_) ฉ	ch
	_)ฉน์

.group		ช
	_) ช	ch
	ช (_	t
	ชร (_	t
	_)ชน์

.group		ฌ
	_) ฌ	ch

.group		ว
	_) ว	w
	L01)วย	uaj	//◌วย
	ว (_	o
	L01)ว(L01	ua	//◌ัว
	แ)ว	ew	// แ◌ว
	_)วน์
	_)วร์


.group		อ
	_) อ	ɔː
	L01)อย(_	ɔj	//◌อย
	อ	ʔ
	L01)อ(L01	ɔː	//◌อ◌
